Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 125
OFFICE AND AGENT

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1997 and was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Section

7-125-101. Registered office and registered agent.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to nonprofit corporations incorporated under or subject to articles 121 to 137 of this title.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 2337, § 289, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 249, § 51, effective May 29.